New York, session 2025-2026, A7933.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "corporate accountability for tax expenditures act". 3 § 2. The business corporation law is amended by adding a new article 4 14 to read as follows: 5 ARTICLE 14 6 CORPORATE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR TAX EXPENDITURES 7 Section 1401. Definitions. 8 1402. Unified economic development budget. 9 1403. Standardized applications for state development assist- 10 ance. 11 1404. State development assistance disclosure. 12 1405. Recapture. 13 § 1401. Definitions. 14 As used in this article: 15 (a) "Base years" means the first two complete calendar years following 16 the effective date of a recipient receiving development assistance. 17 (b) "Date of assistance" means the commencement date of the assistance 18 agreement, which date triggers the period during which the recipient is 19 obligated to create or retain jobs and continue operations at the 20 specific project site. 21 (c) "Default" means that a recipient has not achieved its job 22 creation, job retention, or wage or benefit goals, as applicable, during 23 the prescribed period therefor. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00909-01-5 A. 7933 2 1 (d) "Department" means, unless otherwise noted, the department of 2 taxation and finance or any successor agency. 3 (e) "Development assistance" means (1) tax credits and tax exemptions 4 (other than given under tax increment financing) given as an incentive 5 to a recipient business organization pursuant to an initial certif- 6 ication or an initial designation made by the department under article 7 eighteen-A or eighteen-B of the general municipal law; 8 (2) all successor and subsequent programs and tax credits designed to 9 promote large business relocations and expansions. "Development assist- 10 ance" does not include tax increment financing, assistance provided by 11 industrial development agencies under article eighteen-A or eighteen-B 12 of the general municipal law pursuant to local ordinance, participation 13 loans, or financial transactions through statutorily authorized finan- 14 cial intermediaries in support of small business loans and investments 15 or given in connection with the development of affordable housing. 16 (f) "Development assistance agreement" means any agreement executed by 17 the state granting body and the recipient setting forth the terms and 18 conditions of development assistance to be provided to the recipient 19 consistent with the final application for development assistance, 20 including but not limited to the date of assistance, submitted to and 21 approved by the state granting body. 22 (g) "Full-time, permanent job" means a job in which the new employee 23 works for the recipient at a rate of at least thirty-five hours per 24 week. 25 (h) "New employee" means a full-time, permanent employee who repres- 26 ents a net increase in the number of the recipient's employees state- 27 wide. "New employee" includes an employee who previously filled a new 28 employee position with the recipient who was rehired or called back from 29 a layoff that occurs during or following the base years. 30 The term "new employee" does not include any of the following: 31 (1) An employee of the recipient who performs a job that was previous- 32 ly performed by another employee in this state, if that job existed in 33 this state for at least six months before hiring the employee. 34 (2) A child, grandchild, parent, or spouse, other than a spouse who is 35 legally separated from the individual, of any individual who has a 36 direct or indirect ownership interest of at least five percent in the 37 profits, capital, or value of any member of the recipient. 38 (i) "Part-time job" means a job in which the new employee works for 39 the recipient at a rate of less than thirty-five hours per week. 40 (j) "Recipient" means any business that receives economic development 41 assistance. A business is any corporation, limited liability company, 42 partnership, joint venture, association, sole proprietorship, or other 43 legally recognized entity. 44 (k) "Retained employee" means any employee defined as having a full- 45 time or full-time equivalent job preserved at a specific facility or 46 site, the continuance of which is threatened by a specific and demon- 47 strable threat, which shall be specified in the application for develop- 48 ment assistance. 49 (l) "Specific project site" means that distinct operational unit to 50 which any development assistance is applied. 51 (m) "State granting body" means the department, any other state 52 department or state agency that provides development assistance that has 53 reporting requirements under this article, and any successor agencies to 54 any of the preceding. 55 (n) "Temporary job" means a job in which the new employee is hired for 56 a specific duration of time or season. A. 7933 3 1 (o) "Value of assistance" means the face value of any form of develop- 2 ment assistance. 3 § 1402. Unified economic development budget. 4 (a) For each state fiscal year ending on or after June thirtieth, two 5 thousand twenty-six, the department shall submit an annual unified 6 economic development budget to the governor, senate and assembly. The 7 unified economic development budget shall be due within three months 8 after the end of the fiscal year, and shall present all types of devel- 9 opment assistance granted during the prior fiscal year, including: 10 (1) The aggregate amount of uncollected or diverted state tax revenues 11 resulting from each type of development assistance provided pursuant to 12 law, as reported to the department on tax returns filed during the 13 fiscal year. 14 (2) All state development assistance. 15 (b) All data contained in the unified economic development budget 16 presented to the governor, senate and assembly shall be fully subject to 17 the freedom of information act. 18 (c) The department shall submit a report of the amounts in subpara- 19 graph one of paragraph (a) of this section to the department, which may 20 append such report to the unified economic development budget rather 21 than separately reporting such amounts. 22 § 1403. Standardized applications for state development assistance. 23 (a) All final applications submitted to the department or any other 24 state granting body requesting development assistance shall contain, at 25 a minimum: 26 (1) An application tracking number that is specific to both the state 27 granting agency and to each application. 28 (2) The office mailing address, office telephone number, and chief 29 officer of the granting body. 30 (3) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 31 chief officer of the applicant or authorized designee for the specific 32 project site for which development assistance is requested. 33 (4) The applicant's total number of employees at the specific project 34 site on the date that the application is submitted to the state granting 35 body, including the number of full-time, permanent jobs, the number of 36 part-time jobs, and the number of temporary jobs. 37 (5) The type of development assistance and value of assistance being 38 requested. 39 (6) The number of jobs to be created and retained or both created and 40 retained by the applicant as a result of the development assistance, 41 including the number of full-time, permanent jobs, the number of part- 42 time jobs, and the number of temporary jobs. 43 (7) A detailed list of the occupation or job classifications and 44 number of new employees or retained employees to be hired in full-time, 45 permanent jobs, a schedule of anticipated starting dates of the new 46 hires and the anticipated average wage by occupation or job classifica- 47 tion and total payroll to be created as a result of the development 48 assistance. 49 (8) A list of all other forms of development assistance that the 50 applicant is requesting for the specific project site and the name of 51 each state granting body from which that development assistance is being 52 requested. 53 (9) A narrative, if necessary, describing why the development assist- 54 ance is needed and how the applicant's use of the development assistance 55 may reduce employment at any site in New York. A. 7933 4 1 (10) A certification by the chief officer of the applicant or the 2 chief officer's authorized designee that the information contained in 3 the application submitted to the granting body contains no knowing 4 misrepresentation of material facts upon which eligibility for develop- 5 ment assistance is based. 6 (b) Every state granting body either shall complete, or shall require 7 the applicant to complete, an application form that meets the minimum 8 requirements as prescribed in this section each time an applicant 9 applies for development assistance covered by this article. 10 (c) The department shall have the discretion to modify any standard- 11 ized application for state development assistance required under para- 12 graph (a) of this section for any grants that are not given as an incen- 13 tive to a recipient business organization. 14 § 1404. State development assistance disclosure. 15 (a) Beginning February first, two thousand twenty-seven and each year 16 thereafter, every state granting body shall submit to the department 17 copies of all development assistance agreements that it approved in the 18 prior calendar year. 19 (b) For each development assistance agreement for which the date of 20 assistance has occurred in the prior calendar year, each recipient shall 21 submit to the department a progress report that shall include, but not 22 be limited to, the following: 23 (1) The application tracking number. 24 (2) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 25 chief officer of the granting body. 26 (3) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 27 chief officer of the applicant or authorized designee for the specific 28 project site for which the development assistance was approved by the 29 state granting body. 30 (4) The type of development assistance program and value of assistance 31 that was approved by the state granting body. 32 (5) The applicant's total number of employees at the specific project 33 site on the date that the application was submitted to the state grant- 34 ing body and the applicant's total number of employees at the specific 35 project site on the date of the report, including the number of full- 36 time, permanent jobs, the number of part-time jobs, and the number of 37 temporary jobs, and a computation of the gain or loss of jobs in each 38 category. 39 (6) The number of new employees and retained employees the applicant 40 stated in its development assistance agreement, if any, if not, then in 41 its application, would be created by the development assistance broken 42 down by full-time, permanent, part-time, and temporary. 43 (7) A sworn declaration of whether the recipient is in compliance with 44 the development assistance agreement. 45 (8) A detailed list of the occupation or job classifications and 46 number of new employees or retained employees to be hired in full-time, 47 permanent jobs, a schedule of anticipated starting dates of the new 48 hires and the actual average wage by occupation or job classification 49 and total payroll to be created as a result of the development assist- 50 ance. 51 (9) A narrative, if necessary, describing how the recipient's use of 52 the development assistance during the reporting year has reduced employ- 53 ment at any site in New York. 54 (10) A certification by the chief officer of the applicant or the 55 chief officer's authorized designee that the information in the progress A. 7933 5 1 report contains no knowing misrepresentation of material facts upon 2 which eligibility for development assistance is based. 3 (c) The state granting body, or a successor agency, shall have full 4 authority to verify information contained in the recipient's progress 5 report, including the authority to inspect the specific project site and 6 inspect the records of the recipient that are subject to the development 7 assistance agreement. 8 (d) By June first, two thousand twenty-seven and by June first of each 9 year thereafter, the department shall compile and publish all data in 10 all of the progress reports in both written and electronic form. 11 (e) If a recipient of development assistance fails to comply with 12 paragraph (b) of this section, the department shall, within twenty work- 13 ing days after the reporting submittal deadlines set forth in such para- 14 graph (b), suspend within thirty-three working days any current develop- 15 ment assistance to such recipient under its control, and shall be 16 prohibited from completing any current or providing any future develop- 17 ment assistance until it receives proof that such recipient has come 18 into compliance with the requirements of paragraph (b) of this section. 19 (f) The department shall have the discretion to modify the information 20 required in the progress report required under paragraph (b) of this 21 section consistent with the disclosure purpose of this section for any 22 grants that are not given as an incentive to a recipient business organ- 23 ization. 24 § 1405. Recapture. 25 (a) All development assistance agreements shall contain, at a minimum, 26 the following recapture provisions: 27 (1) The recipient must (i) make the level of capital investment in the 28 economic development project specified in the development assistance 29 agreement; (ii) create or retain, or both, the requisite number of jobs, 30 paying not less than specified wages for the created and retained jobs, 31 within and for the duration of the time period specified in the develop- 32 ment assistance programs and the development assistance agreement. 33 (2) If the recipient fails to create or retain the requisite number of 34 jobs within and for the time period specified, in the development 35 assistance programs and the development assistance agreement, the recip- 36 ient shall be deemed to no longer qualify for the state economic assist- 37 ance and the applicable recapture provisions shall take effect. 38 (3) If the recipient receives state economic assistance in the form of 39 an empire zone designation pursuant to article eighteen-B of the general 40 municipal law or an industrial development zone designation pursuant to 41 article eighteen-A of the general municipal law and the recipient fails 42 to create or retain the requisite number of jobs, as determined by the 43 development assistance agreement within the requisite period of time, 44 the recipient shall be required to pay to the state the full amount of 45 the state tax exemption that it received as a result of such desig- 46 nation. 47 (4) If the recipient receives a grant or loan pursuant to an empire 48 zone designation pursuant to article eighteen-B of the general municipal 49 law or an industrial development zone designation pursuant to article 50 eighteen-A of the general municipal law and the recipient fails to 51 create or retain the requisite number of jobs for the requisite time 52 period, as provided in the development assistance agreement, the recipi- 53 ent shall be required to repay to the state a pro rata amount of the 54 grant; that amount shall reflect the percentage of the deficiency 55 between the requisite number of jobs to be created or retained by the 56 recipient and the actual number of such jobs in existence as of the date A. 7933 6 1 the department determines the recipient is in breach of the job creation 2 or retention covenants contained in the development assistance agree- 3 ment. If the recipient of development assistance under such designations 4 ceases operations at the specific project site during a five year period 5 commencing on the date of assistance, the recipient shall be required to 6 repay the entire amount of the grant or to accelerate repayment of the 7 loan back to the state. 8 (5) If the recipient receives a tax credit under article eighteen-A or 9 eighteen-B of the general municipal law, the development assistance 10 agreement shall provide that (i) if the number of new or retained 11 employees falls below the requisite number set forth in the development 12 assistance agreement, the allowance of the credit shall be automatically 13 suspended until the number of new and retained employees equals or 14 exceeds the requisite number in the development assistance agreement; 15 (ii) if the recipient discontinues operations at the specific project 16 site during the first five years of the term of the development assist- 17 ance agreement, the recipient shall forfeit all credits taken by the 18 recipient during such five year period; and (iii) in the event of a 19 revocation or suspension of the credit, the department shall initiate 20 proceedings against the recipient to recover wrongfully exempted state 21 income taxes and the recipient shall promptly repay to the department 22 any wrongfully exempted state income taxes. The forfeited amount of 23 credits shall be deemed assessed on the date the department initiates 24 proceedings against such recipient and the recipient shall promptly 25 repay to the department any wrongfully exempted state income taxes. 26 (b) The commissioner of taxation and finance may elect to waive 27 enforcement of any contractual provision arising out of the development 28 assistance agreement required by this article based on a finding that 29 the waiver is necessary to avert an imminent and demonstrable hardship 30 to the recipient that may result in such recipient's insolvency or 31 discharge of workers. If a waiver is granted, the recipient shall agree 32 to a contractual modification, including recapture provisions, to the 33 development assistance agreement. The existence of any waiver granted 34 pursuant to paragraph (c) of this section, the date of the granting of 35 such waiver, and a brief summary of the reasons supporting the granting 36 of such waiver shall be disclosed consistent with the provisions of this 37 section. 38 (c) Beginning June first, two thousand twenty-six, the department 39 shall annually compile a report on the outcomes and effectiveness of 40 recapture provisions by program, including but not limited to: (i) the 41 total number of companies that receive development assistance as defined 42 in this article; (ii) the total number of recipients in violation of 43 development agreements with the department; (iii) the total number of 44 completed recapture efforts; (iv) the total number of recapture efforts 45 initiated; and (v) the number of waivers granted. Such report shall be 46 disclosed consistent with the provisions of section fourteen hundred 47 four of this article. 48 § 3. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new article 49 10-E to read as follows: 50 ARTICLE 10-E 51 CORPORATE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR TAX EXPENDITURES 52 Section 3980. Definitions. 53 3981. Unified economic development budget. 54 3982. Standardized applications for state development assist- 55 ance. 56 3983. State development assistance disclosure. A. 7933 7 1 3984. Recapture. 2 § 3980. Definitions. As used in this article: 3 1. "Base years" means the first two complete calendar years following 4 the effective date of a recipient receiving development assistance. 5 2. "Date of assistance" means the commencement date of the assistance 6 agreement, which date triggers the period during which the recipient is 7 obligated to create or retain jobs and continue operations at the 8 specific project site. 9 3. "Default" means that a recipient has not achieved its job creation, 10 job retention, or wage or benefit goals, as applicable, during the 11 prescribed period therefor. 12 4. "Department" means, unless otherwise noted, the department of taxa- 13 tion and finance or any successor agency. 14 5. "Development assistance" means (a) tax credits and tax exemptions 15 (other than given under tax increment financing) given as an incentive 16 to a recipient public authority pursuant to an initial certification or 17 an initial designation made by the department under article eighteen-A 18 or eighteen-B of the general municipal law; 19 (b) all successor and subsequent programs and tax credits designed to 20 promote large business relocations and expansions. "Development assist- 21 ance" does not include tax increment financing, assistance provided by 22 industrial development agencies under article eighteen-A or eighteen-B 23 of the general municipal law pursuant to local ordinance, participation 24 loans, or financial transactions through statutorily authorized finan- 25 cial intermediaries in support of small business loans and investments 26 or given in connection with the development of affordable housing. 27 6. "Development assistance agreement" means any agreement executed by 28 the state granting body and the recipient setting forth the terms and 29 conditions of development assistance to be provided to the recipient 30 consistent with the final application for development assistance, 31 including but not limited to the date of assistance, submitted to and 32 approved by the state granting body. 33 7. "Full-time, permanent job" means a job in which the new employee 34 works for the recipient at a rate of at least thirty-five hours per 35 week. 36 8. "New employee" means a full-time, permanent employee who repres- 37 ents a net increase in the number of the recipient's employees state- 38 wide. "New employee" includes an employee who previously filled a new 39 employee position with the recipient who was rehired or called back from 40 a layoff that occurs during or following the base years. 41 The term "new employee" does not include any of the following: 42 (a) An employee of the recipient who performs a job that was previous- 43 ly performed by another employee in this state, if that job existed in 44 this state for at least six months before hiring the employee. 45 (b) A child, grandchild, parent, or spouse, other than a spouse who is 46 legally separated from the individual, of any individual who has a 47 direct or indirect ownership interest of at least five percent in the 48 profits, capital, or value of any member of the recipient. 49 9. "Part-time job" means a job in which the new employee works for the 50 recipient at a rate of less than thirty-five hours per week. 51 10. "Recipient" means any public authority created pursuant to this 52 chapter that receives economic development assistance or other legally 53 recognized entity of such a public authority. 54 11. "Retained employee" means any employee defined as having a full- 55 time or full-time equivalent job preserved at a specific facility or 56 site, the continuance of which is threatened by a specific and demon- A. 7933 8 1 strable threat, which shall be specified in the application for develop- 2 ment assistance. 3 12. "Specific project site" means that distinct operational unit to 4 which any development assistance is applied. 5 13. "State granting body" means the department, any other state 6 department or state agency that provides development assistance that has 7 reporting requirements under this article, and any successor agencies to 8 any of the preceding. 9 14. "Temporary job" means a job in which the new employee is hired for 10 a specific duration of time or season. 11 15. "Value of assistance" means the face value of any form of develop- 12 ment assistance. 13 § 3981. Unified economic development budget. 1. For each state fiscal 14 year ending on or after June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-six the 15 department shall submit an annual unified economic development budget to 16 the governor, senate and assembly. The unified economic development 17 budget shall be due within three months after the end of the fiscal 18 year, and shall present all types of development assistance granted 19 during the prior fiscal year, including: 20 (a) The aggregate amount of uncollected or diverted state tax revenues 21 resulting from each type of development assistance provided pursuant to 22 law, as reported to the department on tax returns filed during the 23 fiscal year. 24 (b) All state development assistance. 25 2. All data contained in the unified economic development budget 26 presented to the governor, senate and assembly shall be fully subject to 27 the freedom of information act. 28 3. The department shall submit a report of the amounts in paragraph 29 (a) of subdivision one of this section to the department, which may 30 append such report to the unified economic development budget rather 31 than separately reporting such amounts. 32 § 3982. Standardized applications for state development assistance. 33 1. All final applications submitted to the department or any other state 34 granting body requesting development assistance shall contain, at a 35 minimum: 36 (a) An application tracking number that is specific to both the state 37 granting agency and to each application. 38 (b) The office mailing address, office telephone number, and chief 39 officer of the granting body. 40 (c) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 41 chief officer of the applicant or authorized designee for the specific 42 project site for which development assistance is requested. 43 (d) The applicant's total number of employees at the specific project 44 site on the date that the application is submitted to the state granting 45 body, including the number of full-time, permanent jobs, the number of 46 part-time jobs, and the number of temporary jobs. 47 (e) The type of development assistance and value of assistance being 48 requested. 49 (f) The number of jobs to be created and retained or both created and 50 retained by the applicant as a result of the development assistance, 51 including the number of full-time, permanent jobs, the number of part- 52 time jobs, and the number of temporary jobs. 53 (g) A detailed list of the occupation or job classifications and 54 number of new employees or retained employees to be hired in full-time, 55 permanent jobs, a schedule of anticipated starting dates of the new 56 hires and the anticipated average wage by occupation or job classifica- A. 7933 9 1 tion and total payroll to be created as a result of the development 2 assistance. 3 (h) A list of all other forms of development assistance that the 4 applicant is requesting for the specific project site and the name of 5 each state granting body from which that development assistance is being 6 requested. 7 (i) A narrative, if necessary, describing why the development assist- 8 ance is needed and how the applicant's use of the development assistance 9 may reduce employment at any site in New York. 10 (j) A certification by the chief officer of the applicant or the chief 11 officer's authorized designee that the information contained in the 12 application submitted to the granting body contains no knowing misrepre- 13 sentation of material facts upon which eligibility for development 14 assistance is based. 15 2. Every state granting body either shall complete, or shall require 16 the applicant to complete, an application form that meets the minimum 17 requirements as prescribed in this section each time an applicant 18 applies for development assistance covered by this article. 19 3. The department shall have the discretion to modify any standardized 20 application for state development assistance required under subdivision 21 one of this section for any grants that are not given as an incentive to 22 a recipient public authority. 23 § 3983. State development assistance disclosure. 1. Beginning Febru- 24 ary first, two thousand twenty-seven and each year thereafter, every 25 state granting body shall submit to the department copies of all devel- 26 opment assistance agreements that it approved in the prior calendar 27 year. 28 2. For each development assistance agreement for which the date of 29 assistance has occurred in the prior calendar year, each recipient shall 30 submit to the department a progress report that shall include, but not 31 be limited to, the following: 32 (a) The application tracking number. 33 (b) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 34 chief officer of the granting body. 35 (c) The office mailing address, telephone number, and the name of the 36 chief officer of the applicant or authorized designee for the specific 37 project site for which the development assistance was approved by the 38 state granting body. 39 (d) The type of development assistance program and value of assistance 40 that was approved by the state granting body. 41 (e) The applicant's total number of employees at the specific project 42 site on the date that the application was submitted to the state grant- 43 ing body and the applicant's total number of employees at the specific 44 project site on the date of the report, including the number of full- 45 time, permanent jobs, the number of part-time jobs, and the number of 46 temporary jobs, and a computation of the gain or loss of jobs in each 47 category. 48 (f) The number of new employees and retained employees the applicant 49 stated in its development assistance agreement, if any, if not, then in 50 its application, would be created by the development assistance broken 51 down by full-time, permanent, part-time, and temporary. 52 (g) A sworn declaration of whether the recipient is in compliance with 53 the development assistance agreement. 54 (h) A detailed list of the occupation or job classifications and 55 number of new employees or retained employees to be hired in full-time, 56 permanent jobs, a schedule of anticipated starting dates of the new A. 7933 10 1 hires and the actual average wage by occupation or job classification 2 and total payroll to be created as a result of the development assist- 3 ance. 4 (i) A narrative, if necessary, describing how the recipient's use of 5 the development assistance during the reporting year has reduced employ- 6 ment at any site in New York. 7 (j) A certification by the chief officer of the applicant or the chief 8 officer's authorized designee that the information in the progress 9 report contains no knowing misrepresentation of material facts upon 10 which eligibility for development assistance is based. 11 3. The state granting body, or a successor agency, shall have full 12 authority to verify information contained in the recipient's progress 13 report, including the authority to inspect the specific project site and 14 inspect the records of the recipient that are subject to the development 15 assistance agreement. 16 4. By June first, two thousand twenty-seven and by June first of each 17 year thereafter, the department shall compile and publish all data in 18 all of the progress reports in both written and electronic form. 19 5. If a recipient of development assistance fails to comply with 20 subdivision two of this section, the department shall, within twenty 21 working days after the reporting submittal deadlines set forth in such 22 subdivision two, suspend within thirty-three working days any current 23 development assistance to such recipient under its control, and shall be 24 prohibited from completing any current or providing any future develop- 25 ment assistance until it receives proof that such recipient has come 26 into compliance with the requirements of subdivision two of this 27 section. 28 6. The department shall have the discretion to modify the information 29 required in the progress report required under subdivision two of this 30 section consistent with the disclosure purpose of this section for any 31 grants that are not given as an incentive to a recipient public authori- 32 ty. 33 § 3984. Recapture. 1. All development assistance agreements shall 34 contain, at a minimum, the following recapture provisions: 35 (a) The recipient must (i) make the level of capital investment in the 36 economic development project specified in the development assistance 37 agreement; (ii) create or retain, or both, the requisite number of jobs, 38 paying not less than specified wages for the created and retained jobs, 39 within and for the duration of the time period specified in the develop- 40 ment assistance programs and the development assistance agreement. 41 (b) If the recipient fails to create or retain the requisite number of 42 jobs within and for the time period specified, in the development 43 assistance programs and the development assistance agreement, the recip- 44 ient shall be deemed to no longer qualify for the state economic assist- 45 ance and the applicable recapture provisions shall take effect. 46 (c) If the recipient receives state economic assistance in the form of 47 an empire zone designation pursuant to article eighteen-B of the general 48 municipal law or an industrial development zone designation pursuant to 49 article eighteen-A of the general municipal law and the recipient fails 50 to create or retain the requisite number of jobs, as determined by the 51 development assistance agreement within the requisite period of time, 52 the recipient shall be required to pay to the state the full amount of 53 the state tax exemption that it received as a result of such desig- 54 nation. 55 (d) If the recipient receives a grant or loan pursuant to an empire 56 zone designation pursuant to article eighteen-B of the general municipal A. 7933 11 1 law or an industrial development zone designation pursuant to article 2 eighteen-A of the general municipal law and the recipient fails to 3 create or retain the requisite number of jobs for the requisite time 4 period, as provided in the development assistance agreement, the recipi- 5 ent shall be required to repay to the state a pro rata amount of the 6 grant; that amount shall reflect the percentage of the deficiency 7 between the requisite number of jobs to be created or retained by the 8 recipient and the actual number of such jobs in existence as of the date 9 the department determines the recipient is in breach of the job creation 10 or retention covenants contained in the development assistance agree- 11 ment. If the recipient of development assistance under such designations 12 ceases operations at the specific project site during a five year period 13 commencing on the date of assistance, the recipient shall be required to 14 repay the entire amount of the grant or to accelerate repayment of the 15 loan back to the state. 16 (e) If the recipient receives a tax credit under article eighteen-A or 17 eighteen-B of the general municipal law, the development assistance 18 agreement shall provide that (i) if the number of new or retained 19 employees falls below the requisite number set forth in the development 20 assistance agreement, the allowance of the credit shall be automatically 21 suspended until the number of new and retained employees equals or 22 exceeds the requisite number in the development assistance agreement; 23 (ii) if the recipient discontinues operations at the specific project 24 site during the first five years of the term of the development assist- 25 ance agreement, the recipient shall forfeit all credits taken by the 26 recipient during such five year period; and (iii) in the event of a 27 revocation or suspension of the credit, the department shall initiate 28 proceedings against the recipient to recover wrongfully exempted state 29 income taxes and the recipient shall promptly repay to the department 30 any wrongfully exempted state income taxes. The forfeited amount of 31 credits shall be deemed assessed on the date the department initiates 32 proceedings against such recipient and the recipient shall promptly 33 repay to the department any wrongfully exempted state income taxes. 34 2. The commissioner of taxation and finance may elect to waive 35 enforcement of any contractual provision arising out of the development 36 assistance agreement required by this article based on a finding that 37 the waiver is necessary to avert an imminent and demonstrable hardship 38 to the recipient that may result in such recipient's insolvency or 39 discharge of workers. If a waiver is granted, the recipient shall agree 40 to a contractual modification, including recapture provisions, to the 41 development assistance agreement. The existence of any waiver granted 42 pursuant to subdivision three of this section, the date of the granting 43 of such waiver, and a brief summary of the reasons supporting the grant- 44 ing of such waiver shall be disclosed consistent with the provisions of 45 this section. 46 3. Beginning June first, two thousand twenty-six, the department shall 47 annually compile a report on the outcomes and effectiveness of recapture 48 provisions by program, including but not limited to: (a) the total 49 number of authorities that receive development assistance as defined in 50 this article; (b) the total number of recipients in violation of devel- 51 opment agreements with the department; (c) the total number of completed 52 recapture efforts; (d) the total number of recapture efforts initiated; 53 and (e) the number of waivers granted. Such report shall be disclosed 54 consistent with the provisions of section thirty-nine hundred eighty- 55 three of this article. A. 7933 12 1 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 2 it shall have become a law and shall apply to contracts and agreements 3 entered into on or after such effective date. Effective immediately, 4 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 5 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 6 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.